lexicon/alpha.lexc
Multichar_Symbols ⟪c⟫ ⟪p⟫ ⟪t⟫ ⟪k⟫ ⟪g⟫ ⟪K⟫ ⟪D⟫ ⟪C⟫
                  ⟪sBRV⟫ ⟪sBUV⟫ ⟪sFRV⟫ ⟪sFUV⟫
                  ⟪sUC⟫ ⟪sVC⟫

LEXICON Root
<A|E|I|İ|O|Ö|U|Ü>                                           #;
<[B|C|Ç|D|F|G|Ğ|H|J|K|L|M|N|P|R|S|Ş|T|V|Y|Z] ⟪sFUV⟫>        #;
<[H|K|Q|W] ⟪sBUV⟫>                                          #;
<H ⟪sBUV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫>                                            #;
<X ⟪sFUV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫>                                            #;
<a|e|ı|i|o|ö|u|ü>                                         #;
<[b|c|ç|d|f|g|ğ|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|ş|t|v|y|z] ⟪sFUV⟫>      #;
<[h|k|q|w] ⟪sBUV⟫>                                        #;
<h ⟪sBUV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫>                                          #;
<x ⟪sFUV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫>                                          #;
